Alaska, session 34, HB45.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 04 * Section 1. AS 44.09.030(b) is amended to read: 05 (b) The flag of the United States and the flag of the State of Alaska shall be 06 displayed daily, weather permitting, [IN THE FOLLOWING PLACES: 07 (1)] on or near the main administration building of every institution 08 under the authority or control of the state government and [; 09 (2)] in or near every schoolhouse during school days. A governmental 10 entity that displays the flag of the United States must display the flag in a 11 prominent position that is higher than any other flag displayed. 12 * Sec. 2. AS 44.09.030 is amended by adding new subsections to read: 13 (f) A governmental entity may not erect or display a flag that represents a 14 political viewpoint, including a viewpoint concerning race, sexual orientation, gender, 01 or a politically partisan or political ideology. This subsection does not limit the ability 02 of a private individual to express private speech or viewpoints or exercise the 03 individual's right to freedom of speech protected by the First Amendment to the 04 Constitution of the United States or the ability of a governmental entity to display or 05 erect a flag required or authorized by law. 06 (g) Except when directly ordered not to use force by a peace officer acting 07 within the scope and authority of the peace officer's employment, an active or retired 08 member of the armed forces of the United States or the National Guard may use 09 reasonable force to prevent the desecration, destruction, or removal of the United 10 States flag or to replace the United States flag to a prominent position consistent with 11 (b) of this section and is immune from civil or criminal liability for that use of 12 reasonable force. 13 (h) In this section, "governmental entity" means a governmental agency, local 14 government or unit of local government, public school, or public college or university. 15 * Sec. 3. This Act takes effect July 1, 2025. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.